Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-403.03
Nebraska Library Commission; director; salary increase; when effective.

Section 51-403 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose, to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for the director of the Nebraska Library Commission; and to permit a change of such salary as soon as same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1965, c. 315, § 2, p. 879;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 7.